vendor/wikimedia/langconv/fst/crh-exceptions.foma
  [ {ё} -> {yö} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{ь}|{е}|{ю}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Ё} -> {Yö} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}] ] [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}] ] [ [{ь}|{е}|{ю}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Ё} -> {YÖ} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{Ь}|{Е}|{Ю}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {ё} -> {yö} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{ь}|{е}|{ю}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Ё} -> {Yö} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}] ] [ [{ь}|{е}|{ю}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Ё} -> {YÖ} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{Ь}|{Е}|{Ю}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {у} -> {ü} || [.#.|br] [ [{б}|{г}|{к}|{м}|{ш}|{c}|{Б}|{Г}|{К}|{М}|{Ш}|{C}] ] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {у} -> {ü} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {у} {ю} -> {üyü} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {У} -> {Ü} || [.#.|br] [ [{б}|{г}|{к}|{м}|{ш}|{c}|{Б}|{Г}|{К}|{М}|{Ш}|{C}] ] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}|{Е}|{И}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Ь}|{Ü}] ] ]
];
define CRH'LATN'PATTERNS'3(br) [
  [ {У} -> {Ü} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}|{Е}|{И}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Ь}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {У} {ю} -> {Üyü} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {У} {Ю} -> {ÜYÜ} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {у} -> {ü} || [.#.|br] [ [{б}|{г}|{к}|{м}|{ш}|{c}|{Б}|{Г}|{К}|{М}|{Ш}|{C}] ] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {у} -> {ü} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {у} {ю} -> {üyü} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {У} -> {Ü} || [.#.|br] [ [{б}|{г}|{к}|{м}|{ш}|{c}|{Б}|{Г}|{К}|{М}|{Ш}|{C}] ] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}|{Е}|{И}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Ь}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {У} -> {Ü} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}|{Е}|{И}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Ь}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {У} {ю} -> {Üyü} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {У} {Ю} -> {ÜYÜ} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {ю} -> {yü} || [.#.|br] [ ([{а}|{ы}|{о}|{у}|{е}|{и}|{ё}|{ю}|{А}|{Ы}|{О}|{У}|{Е}|{И}|{Ё}|{Ю}]) ] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{ь}|{е}|{ю}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Ю} -> {Yü} || [.#.|br] [ ([{А}|{Ы}|{О}|{У}|{Е}|{И}|{Ё}|{Ю}]) ] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}] ] [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}] ] [ [{ь}|{е}|{ю}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Ю} -> {YÜ} || [.#.|br] [ ([{А}|{Ы}|{О}|{У}|{Е}|{И}|{Ё}|{Ю}]) ] _ [ [{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{Ь}|{Е}|{Ю}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {ю} -> {yü} || [.#.|br] [ ([{а}|{ы}|{о}|{у}|{е}|{и}|{ё}|{ю}|{А}|{Ы}|{О}|{У}|{Е}|{И}|{Ё}|{Ю}]) ] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{ь}|{е}|{ю}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Ю} -> {Yü} || [.#.|br] [ ([{А}|{Ы}|{О}|{У}|{Е}|{И}|{Ё}|{Ю}]) ] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}] ] [ [{ь}|{е}|{ю}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Ю} -> {YÜ} || [.#.|br] [ ([{А}|{Ы}|{О}|{У}|{Е}|{И}|{Ё}|{Ю}]) ] _ [ [{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{Ь}|{Е}|{Ю}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {е} @-> {ye} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Е} -> {Ye} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{а}|{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{е}|{ё}|{ж}|{з}|{и}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{о}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{у}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{ъ}|{ы}|{ь}|{э}|{ю}|{я}|{c}|{ğ}|{ñ}|{q}|{ö}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Е} -> {YE} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{А}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Ж}|{З}|{И}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{О}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{У}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{Ъ}|{Ы}|{Ь}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{C}|{Ğ}|{Ñ}|{Q}|{Ö}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {я} @-> {ya} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Я} -> {Ya} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{а}|{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{е}|{ё}|{ж}|{з}|{и}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{о}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{у}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{ъ}|{ы}|{ь}|{э}|{ю}|{я}|{c}|{ğ}|{ñ}|{q}|{ö}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Я} -> {YA} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{А}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Ж}|{З}|{И}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{О}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{У}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{Ъ}|{Ы}|{Ь}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{C}|{Ğ}|{Ñ}|{Q}|{Ö}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {е} -> {ye} || [ [{а}|{е}|{ё}|{и}|{о}|{у}|{ы}|{э}|{ю}|{я}|{й}|{ь}|{ъ}|{a}|{e}|{ö}|{ü}|{А}|{Е}|{Ё}|{И}|{О}|{У}|{Ы}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{Й}|{Ь}|{Ъ}|{A}|{E}|{Ö}|{Ü}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {Е} -> {Ye} || [ [{а}|{е}|{ё}|{и}|{о}|{у}|{ы}|{э}|{ю}|{я}|{й}|{ь}|{ъ}|{a}|{e}|{ö}|{ü}|{А}|{Е}|{Ё}|{И}|{О}|{У}|{Ы}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{Й}|{Ь}|{Ъ}|{A}|{E}|{Ö}|{Ü}] ] _ [ [{а}|{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{е}|{ё}|{ж}|{з}|{и}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{о}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{у}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{ъ}|{ы}|{ь}|{э}|{ю}|{я}|{c}|{ğ}|{ñ}|{q}|{ö}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Е} -> {YE} || [ [{а}|{е}|{ё}|{и}|{о}|{у}|{ы}|{э}|{ю}|{я}|{й}|{ь}|{ъ}|{a}|{e}|{ö}|{ü}|{А}|{Е}|{Ё}|{И}|{О}|{У}|{Ы}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{Й}|{Ь}|{Ъ}|{A}|{E}|{Ö}|{Ü}] ] _ [ [{А}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Ж}|{З}|{И}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{О}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{У}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{Ъ}|{Ы}|{Ь}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{C}|{Ğ}|{Ñ}|{Q}|{Ö}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {я} -> {ya} || [ [{а}|{е}|{ё}|{и}|{о}|{у}|{ы}|{э}|{ю}|{я}|{й}|{ь}|{ъ}|{a}|{e}|{ö}|{ü}|{ğ}|{q}|{А}|{Е}|{Ё}|{И}|{О}|{У}|{Ы}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{Й}|{Ь}|{Ъ}|{A}|{E}|{Ö}|{Ü}|{Ğ}|{Q}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {Я} -> {Ya} || [ [{а}|{е}|{ё}|{и}|{о}|{у}|{ы}|{э}|{ю}|{я}|{й}|{ь}|{ъ}|{a}|{e}|{ö}|{ü}|{ğ}|{q}|{А}|{Е}|{Ё}|{И}|{О}|{У}|{Ы}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{Й}|{Ь}|{Ъ}|{A}|{E}|{Ö}|{Ü}|{Ğ}|{Q}] ] _ [ [{а}|{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{е}|{ё}|{ж}|{з}|{и}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{о}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{у}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{ъ}|{ы}|{ь}|{э}|{ю}|{я}|{c}|{ğ}|{ñ}|{q}|{ö}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {Я} -> {YA} || [ [{а}|{е}|{ё}|{и}|{о}|{у}|{ы}|{э}|{ю}|{я}|{й}|{ь}|{ъ}|{a}|{e}|{ö}|{ü}|{ğ}|{q}|{А}|{Е}|{Ё}|{И}|{О}|{У}|{Ы}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{Й}|{Ь}|{Ъ}|{A}|{E}|{Ö}|{Ü}|{Ğ}|{Q}] ] _ [ [{А}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Е}|{Ё}|{Ж}|{З}|{И}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{О}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{У}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{Ъ}|{Ы}|{Ь}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Я}|{C}|{Ğ}|{Ñ}|{Q}|{Ö}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {льон} @-> {lyon} ] .o.
  [ {ЛЬОН} @-> {LYON} ] .o.
  [ {к} {о} {з} {ь} -> {köz} || _ [ [\[{я}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {К} {о} {з} {ь} -> {Köz} || _ [ [\[{я}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {К} {О} {З} {Ь} -> {KÖZ} || _ [ [\[{Я}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {ю} -> {ü} || [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] _ ] .o.
  [ {Ю} -> {Ü} || [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] _ ] .o.
